California, session 20252026, SB1354.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Part 3 (commencing with Section 570) is added to Division 2 of the Military and Veterans Code, to read:PART 3. Defense of the State570. (a) Military personnel of another state, territory, or district shall not enter, or cause something to enter, the state to perform military duty or law enforcement functions for another state without the permission of the Governor.(b) This section does not apply to military any of the following:(1) Military personnel of another state, territory, or district who have been called into active federal service under Title 10 of the United States Code and who are acting under the authority of the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense.(2) A military compact entered into between one or more states prior to January 1, 2027.(3) An educational course or training exercise involving military personnel of another state, territory, or district taking place in California.(c) The Governor may delegate the authority to grant permission to enter the state, as described in subdivision (a), to the Adjutant General.